Nebraska, session 109, LB114.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB114 LB114
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-483, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-483 (1) The director shall assign a distinguishing number to each
operator's license issued and shall keep a record of the same which shall
be open to public inspection by any person requesting inspection of such
record who qualifies under section 60-2906 or 60-2907. Any person
requesting such driver record information shall furnish to the Department
of Motor Vehicles (a) verification of identity and purpose that the
requester is entitled under section 60-2906 or 60-2907 to disclosure of
the personal information in the record, (b) the name of the person whose
record is being requested, and (c) when the name alone is insufficient to
identify the correct record, the department may request additional
identifying information. The department shall, upon request of any
requester, furnish a certified abstract of the operating record of any
person, in either hard copy or electronically, and shall charge the
requester a fee of three dollars per abstract.
(2) The department shall remit any revenue generated under
subsections (1) through (5) of this section to the State Treasurer, and
the State Treasurer shall credit forty-one and two-thirds percent to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund, twenty-five percent to the
General Fund, and thirty-three and one-third percent to the Records
Management Cash Fund.
(3) The director shall, upon receiving a request and an agreement
from the United States Selective Service System to comply with
requirements of this section, furnish driver record information to the
United States Selective Service System to include the name, post office
address, date of birth, sex, and social security number of licensees. The
United States Selective Service System shall pay all costs incurred by
the department in providing the information but shall not be required to
pay any other fee required by law for information. No driver record
information shall be furnished to the United States Selective Service
-2-

LB114 LB114
2025 2025
System regarding any female, nor regarding any male other than those
between the ages of seventeen years and twenty-six years. The information
shall only be used in the fulfillment of the required duties of the
United States Selective Service System and shall not be furnished to any
other person.
(4) The director shall keep a record of all applications for
operators' licenses that are disapproved with a brief statement of the
reason for disapproval of the application.
(5) The director may establish a monitoring service which provides
information on operating records that have changed due to any adjudicated
traffic citation or administrative action. The director shall charge a
fee of thirty six cents per operating record searched pursuant to this
section and the fee provided in subsection (1) of this section for each
abstract returned as a result of the search. For each fee charged the
department shall remit to the State Treasurer twenty-four cents to be
credited to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and six cents to
be credited as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Driver record header information, including name, license
number, date of birth, address, and physical description, from every
driver record maintained by the department may be made available so long
as the Uniform Motor Vehicle Records Disclosure Act is not violated.
Monthly updates, including all new records, may also be made available.
There shall be a fee of thirty eighteen dollars per thousand records. All
fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(7) The department may enter into a reciprocity agreement with a
foreign country to provide for the mutual recognition and reciprocal
exchange of a valid operator's license issued by this state or the
foreign country if the department determines that the licensing standards
of the foreign country are comparable to those of this state. Any such
agreement entered into by the department shall not include the mutual
-3-

LB114 LB114
2025 2025
recognition and reciprocal exchange of a commercial driver's license.
(8) For Beginning July 1, 2021, for any record provided pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the requester shall be required to pay,
in addition to the fee prescribed in such subsection, a fee of twenty-one
dollars four dollars and fifty cents per record. For each fee charged the
department shall remit to the State Treasurer five dollars and fifty
Fifty cents to shall be credited to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash
Fund, eleven dollars and fifty cents to be credited to the General fund,
and four dollars to shall be credited to the Operator's License Services
System Replacement and Maintenance Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 60-1506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-1506 (1) For purposes of this section, vehicle means any motor
vehicle, trailer, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle,
snowmobile, or minibike.
(2) (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall keep a record of each
motor vehicle , trailer, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, utility-type
vehicle, snowmobile, and minibike registered or titled in this state,
alphabetically by name of the owner, with cross reference in each
instance to the registration number assigned to such motor vehicle ,
trailer, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle,
snowmobile, and minibike. The record may be destroyed by any public
officer having custody of it after three years from the date of its
issuance.
(3)(a) (2) The department shall issue a copy of the record of a
registered or titled motor vehicle , trailer, motorboat, all-terrain
vehicle, utility-type vehicle, snowmobile, or minibike to any person
after receiving from the person the name on the registration or
certificate of title, the license plate number, the vehicle
identification or other type of identification number, or the title
number of a motor vehicle, trailer, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle,
-4-

LB114 LB114
2025 2025
utility-type vehicle, snowmobile, or minibike, if the person provides to
the department verification of identity and purpose pursuant to section
60-2906 or 60-2907. A fee of three dollars one dollar shall be charged
for the copy. Any fee received by the department pursuant to this
subdivision shall be deposited into the License Plate Cash Fund.
(b) An extract of the entire file of motor vehicles , trailers,
motorboats, all-terrain vehicles, utility-type vehicles, snowmobiles, and
minibikes registered or titled in the state or updates to the entire file
may be provided to a person upon payment of a fee of forty eighteen
dollars per thousand records. Any fee received by the department pursuant
to this subdivision subsection shall be deposited into the Department of
Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(4) (3) The record of each motor vehicle , trailer, motorboat, all-
terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, snowmobile, or minibike
registration or title maintained by the department pursuant to this
section may be made available electronically through the portal
established under section 84-1204 so long as the Uniform Motor Vehicle
Records Disclosure Act is not violated. There shall be a fee of three
dollars one dollar per record for individual records and for data-to-data
requests for multiple motor vehicle , trailer, motorboat, all-terrain
vehicle, utility-type vehicle, snowmobile, or minibike title and
registration records. For bulk record requests of multiple motor
vehicle , trailer, motorboat, all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle,
snowmobile, or minibike titles and registrations selected on the basis of
criteria of the individual making the request, there shall be a fee of
fifty dollars for every request under two thousand records, and a fee of
forty eighteen dollars per one thousand records for any number of records
over two thousand, plus a reasonable programming fee not to exceed five
hundred twenty dollars. All fees collected pursuant to this subsection
for electronic access to records through the portal shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer and shall be credited to deposited in the Records
-5-

LB114 LB114
2025 2025
Management Cash Fund and shall be distributed as provided in any
agreements between the State Records Board and the department, except two
dollars per record for individual records and twenty-two dollars per one
thousand records for any request over two thousand records shall be
credited to the License Plate Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 60-1509, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-1509 (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall build and
maintain a new operator's license services system for the issuance of
operators' licenses and state identification cards. The Director of Motor
Vehicles shall designate an implementation date for the new system which
date is on or before July 1, 2032.
(2) The Operator's License Services System Replacement and
Maintenance Fund is created. The fund shall consist of amounts credited
under subsection (8) of section 60-483. The fund shall be used for the
building, implementation, and maintenance of a new operator's license
services system for the issuance of operators' licenses and state
identification cards.
(3) Any money in the Operator's License Services System Replacement
and Maintenance Fund available for investment shall be invested by the
state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024,
any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be
credited to the General Fund.
Sec. 4. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. Original section 60-1506, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 60-483 and 60-1509, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-